ja: 使用可能なおもちゃの乗り物の種類: 飛行機; ボート; 車; 工事車両; ヘリコプター; バイク; レーシングカー&トラックセット; 宇宙船; 電車&電車セット; トラック; その他
tr: Uyumlu oyun aracı türü: Uçak; Bot; Araba; İnşaat aracı; Helikopter; Motosiklet; Yarış arabası ve pist seti; Uzay Aracı; Trenler ve tren seti; Kamyon; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip vehicul agrement compatibil: Avion; Barcă; Mașină; Vehicul pentru construcții; Elicopter; Motocicletă; Set mașină de curse și pistă; Navă spațială; Trenuri și seturi de trenuri; Camion; Altele
fr: Type de véhicule de jeu compatible: Avion; Bateau; Voiture; Véhicule de construction; Hélicoptère; Moto; Voiture de course et circuit; Vaisseaux spatiaux; Trains et set de train; Camion; Autre
th: ประเภทรถของเล่นที่เข้ากันได้: เครื่องบิน; เรือขนาดเล็ก; รถยนต์; รถก่อสร้าง; เฮลิคอปเตอร์; รถจักรยานยนต์; รถแข่งและสนามแข่ง; ยานอวกาศ; รถไฟและชุดรถไฟ; รถบรรทุก; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta igračke vozila: Zrakoplov; Brod; Automobil; Građevinsko vozilo; Helikopter; Motocikl; Set automobila i staza za utrku; Svemirska letjelica; Vlakovi i setovi vlakova; Kamion; Ostalo
pl: Kompatybilny typ pojazdu do zabawy: Samolot; Łódź; Samochód; Pojazd budowlany; Śmigłowiec; Motocykl; Zestaw samochodu wyścigowego i toru; Statek kosmiczny; Pociągi i zestaw pociągów; Ciężarówka; Inne
zh-CN: 兼容游戏车辆类型: 飞机游戏; 船型; 汽车; 工程车游戏; 直升机; 摩托车; 赛车与赛道套装游戏; 宇宙飞船; 火车与火车套装游戏; 卡车; 其他
ru: Совместимый тип игрушечного транспортного средства: Самолет; Лодка; Автомобиль; Строительная машина; Вертолет; Мотоцикл; Гоночный автомобиль и набор трасс; Космический корабль; Поезда и наборы поездов; Грузовик; Другое
hu: Kompatibilis játékjármű típusa: Repülőgép; Hajó; Autó; Építőipari jármű; Helikopter; Motorkerékpár; Versenyautó- és pályakészlet; Űrhajó; Vonatok és vonatkészlet; Teherautó; Egyéb
da: Kompatibel legevognstype: Fly; Båd; Bil; Byggemaskine; Helikopter; Motorcykel; Racerbiler og racerbaner; Rumfartøjer; Tog og togsæt; Lastbil; Andet
es: Tipo de vehículo de juego compatible: Avión; Barco; Auto; Vehículos de construcción; Helicóptero; Motocicleta; Colecciones de coches de carreras; Nave espacial; Trenes y juegos de trenes; Camión; Otros
bg-BG: Съвместим тип превозно средство за игра: Самолет; Лодка; Автомобил; Строително превозно средство; Хеликоптер; Мотоциклет; Комплект състезателна кола и писта; Космически кораб; Влакове и влакови композиции; Камион; Други
de: Kompatibler Spielfahrzeugtyp: Flugzeug; Boot; Pkw; Baufahrzeug; Hubschrauber; Motorrad; Rennwagen- und Streckenset; Raumfahrzeug; Eisenbahnen und Eisenbahnset; LKW; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta vozila za igranje: Letalo; Čoln; Avto; Gradbeno vozilo; Helikopter; Motorno kolo; Komplet dirkalnih avtomobilov in steze; Vesoljsko plovilo; Komplet vlakov in tirnic; Tovornjak; Drugo
nb: Kompatibel type lekekjøretøy: Fly; Båt; Bil; Anleggskjøretøy; Helikopter; Motorsykkel; Racerbil- og banesett; Romfartøy; Tog og togsett; Lastebil; Annet
lt-LT: Suderinamas žaislinės transporto priemonės tipas: Lėktuvas; Valtis; Automobilis; Statybinė transporto priemonė; Sraigtasparnis; Motociklas; Lenktyninio automobilio ir trasos rinkinys; Erdvėlaivis; Traukiniai ir traukinių rinkiniai; Sunkvežimis; Kita
en: Compatible play vehicle type: Airplane; Boat; Car; Construction vehicle; Helicopter; Motorcycle; Race car & track set; Spacecraft; Trains & train set; Truck; Other
fi: Yhteensopiva leikkiajoneuvotyyppi: Lentokone; Vene; Auto; Rakennusajoneuvo; Helikopteri; Moottoripyörä; Kilpa-auto ja ratasarja; Avaruusalukset; Junat ja junasarja; Lava-auto; Muu
it: Tipo di veicolo da gioco compatibile: Aereo; Barca; Automobile; Veicolo da costruzione; Elicottero; Motociclo; Set di auto e piste da corsa; Navicella spaziale; Treni e set di treni; Camion; Altro
vi: Loại xe đồ chơi tương thích: Máy bay; Thuyền; Ô tô; Xe thi công; Trực thăng; Mô tô; Bộ xe đua; Tàu vũ trụ; Bộ xe lửa; Xe tải; Khác
zh-TW: 相容的遊戲車輛類型: 飛機; 船; 車; 工程車; 直升機; 摩托車; 賽車/軌道組; 太空船; 火車套裝組; 卡車; 其他
sv: Kompatibel lekfordonstyp: Flygplan; Båt; Bil; Byggfordon; Helikopter; Motorcykel; Paket med leksaksracerbilar och bilbanor; Rymdskepp; Leksakståg och leksaksjärnvägar; Lastbil; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de veículo de jogo compatível: Avião; Barco; Carro; Veículo de construção; Helicóptero; Motociclo; Conjunto de pista e carro de corrida; Nave espacial; Conjunto de comboio e pista de comboios; Camião; Outro
nl: Compatibel speelvoertuigtype: Vliegtuig; Boot; Auto; Bouwvoertuig; Helikopter; Motorfiets; Speelgoedracebaan en -auto's; Ruimtevaartuig; Speelgoedtreinen en treinset; Vrachtauto; Andere
pt-BR: Tipo de veículo de reprodução compatível: Avião; Barco; Carro; Veículos de construção; Helicóptero; Motocicleta; Conjunto de carro de corrida e pista; Nave espacial; Trem e conjunto de trens; Caminhão; Outro
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ hračkárskeho autíčka: Lietadlo; Čln; Auto; Stavebné vozidlo; Helikoptéra; Motocykel; Súprava pretekárskeho auta a dráhy; Kozmická loď; Vlaky a vlaková súprava; Nákladné auto; Iné
el: Συμβατός τύπος οχήματος παιχνιδιού: Αεροπλάνο; Βάρκα; Αυτοκίνητο; Κατασκευαστικό όχημα; Ελικόπτερο; Μοτοσυκλέτα; Σετ αγωνιστικών αυτοκινήτων και πίστας; Διαστημόπλοιο; Τρένα και σετ τρένων; Φορτηγό; Άλλο
ko: 호환 가능한 장난감 차 유형: 비행기; 보트; 자동차; 건설 차량; 헬리콥터; 오토바이; 레이싱카 & 트랙 세트; 우주선; 기차 & 기차 세트; 트럭; 기타
cs: Kompatibilní typ vozidla na hraní: Letadlo; Loď; Automobil; Stavební vozidlo; Helikoptéra; Motocykl; Sada závodních autíček a dráhy; Kosmická loď; Vláčky a vláčková sada; Nákladní vozidlo; Jiné